California statutes. Labor Code
(3) If, and to the extent, the actual number of employees meeting the requirements of this chapter exceeds the number of those employees communicated to bona fide bidders in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1072.

(c) An employee or his or her agent shall not bring an action against a successor contractor or subcontractor under subdivision (a) of Section 1073 without first giving the successor contractor or subcontractor written notice of the violation or breach and 30 days to cure the violation or breach. An awarding authority shall not terminate a service contract under subdivision (a) of Section 1074 without first giving the successor contractor or subcontractor written notice of the violation or breach and 30 days to cure the violation or breach.

(d) This chapter shall only apply to service contracts for the collection and transportation of solid waste when an awarding agency decides to let an exclusive solid waste collection and
 transportation contract out to bid. It is not intended to determine whether or not a local agency should procure a service contract by inviting bids, extend an existing service contract, renegotiate its service contract with the prior contractor, or exercise any other right it possesses pursuant to Section 40059 of the Public Resources Code to determine aspects of solid waste handling that are of local concern.

(e) This chapter does not modify, limit, or abrogate in any manner any franchise, contract, license, or permit granted or extended by a city, county, or other local government agency before January 1, 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 874, Sec. 5.   (AB 1669)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1076.

The amendments and additions to this chapter made by the act adding this section shall not apply to contracts awarded before January 1, 2017, or to contracts for which the bid process has been completed before January 1, 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 874, Sec. 6.   (AB 1669)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Political Affiliations [1101. - 1106.]

1101.

No employer shall make, adopt, or enforce any rule, regulation, or policy:

(a) Forbidding or preventing employees from engaging or participating in politics or from becoming candidates for public office.

(b) Controlling or directing, or tending to control or direct the political activities or affiliations of employees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.

No employer shall coerce or influence or attempt to coerce or influence his employees through or by means of threat of discharge or loss of employment to adopt or follow or refrain from adopting or following any particular course or line of political action or political activity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.5.

(a) An employer, or any person acting on behalf of the employer, shall not make, adopt, or enforce any rule, regulation, or policy preventing an employee from disclosing information to a government or law enforcement agency, to a person with authority over the employee, or to another employee who has authority to investigate, discover, or correct the violation or noncompliance, or from providing information to, or testifying before, any public body conducting an investigation, hearing, or inquiry, if the employee has reasonable cause to believe that the information discloses a violation of state or federal statute, or a violation of or noncompliance with a local, state, or federal rule or regulation, regardless of whether disclosing the information is part of the employee’s job duties.

(b) An employer, or any person acting on behalf of the employer, shall not retaliate against an employee for disclosing information, or because the employer believes that the employee disclosed or may disclose information, to a government or law enforcement agency, to a person with authority over the employee or another employee who has the authority to investigate, discover, or correct the violation or noncompliance, or for providing information to, or testifying before, any public body conducting an investigation, hearing, or inquiry, if the employee has reasonable cause to believe that the information discloses a violation of state or federal statute, or a violation of or noncompliance with a local, state, or federal rule or regulation, regardless of whether disclosing the information is part of the employee’s job duties.

(c) An employer, or any person acting on behalf of the
 employer, shall not retaliate against an employee for refusing to participate in an activity that would result in a violation of state or federal statute, or a violation of or noncompliance with a local, state, or federal rule or regulation.

(d) An employer, or any person acting on behalf of the employer, shall not retaliate against an employee for having exercised their rights under subdivision (a), (b), or (c) in any former employment.

(e) A report made by an employee of a government agency to their employer is a disclosure of information to a government or law enforcement agency pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b).

(f) (1) In addition to other remedies available, an employer is liable for a civil penalty not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per employee for each violation of this
 section to be awarded to the employee who was retaliated against.

(2) In assessing this penalty, the Labor Commissioner shall consider the nature and seriousness of the violation based on the evidence obtained during the course of the investigation. The Labor Commissioner’s consideration of the nature and seriousness of the violation shall include, but is not limited to, the type of violation, the economic or mental harm suffered, and the chilling effect on the exercise of employment rights in the workplace, and shall be considered to the extent evidence obtained during the investigation concerned any of these or other relevant factors.

(g) This section does not apply to rules, regulations, or policies that implement, or to actions by employers against employees who violate, the confidentiality of the lawyer-client privilege of Article 3 (commencing with Section 950) of, or the
 physician-patient privilege of Article 6 (commencing with Section 990) of, Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, or trade secret information.

(h) An employer, or a person acting on behalf of the employer, shall not retaliate against an employee because the employee is a family member of a person who has, or is perceived to have, engaged in any acts protected by this section.

(i) For purposes of this section, “employer” or “a person acting on behalf of the employer” includes, but is not limited to, a client employer as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 2810.3 and an employer listed in subdivision (b) of Section 6400.

(j) The court is authorized to award reasonable attorney’s fees to a plaintiff who brings a successful action for a violation of these
 provisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 612, Sec. 2.   (SB 497)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.6.

In a civil action or administrative proceeding brought pursuant to Section 1102.5, once it has been demonstrated by a preponderance of the evidence that an activity proscribed by Section 1102.5 was a contributing factor in the alleged prohibited action against the employee, the employer shall have the burden of proof to demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that the alleged action would have occurred for legitimate, independent reasons even if the employee had not engaged in activities protected by Section 1102.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 484, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.61.

In any civil action or administrative proceeding brought pursuant to Section 1102.5, an employee may petition the superior court in any county wherein the violation in question is alleged to have occurred, or wherein the person resides or transacts business, for appropriate temporary or preliminary injunctive relief as set forth in Section 1102.62.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 460, Sec. 3.   (SB 306)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.62.

(a) Upon the filing of the petition for injunctive relief, the petitioner shall cause notice thereof to be served upon the person, and thereupon the court shall have jurisdiction to grant such temporary injunctive relief as the court deems just and proper.

(b) In addition to any harm resulting directly from the violation of Section 1102.5, the court shall consider the chilling effect on other employees asserting their rights under that section in determining whether temporary injunctive relief is just and proper.

(c) Appropriate injunctive relief shall be issued on a showing that reasonable cause exists to
 believe a violation has occurred.

(d) The order authorizing temporary injunctive relief shall remain in effect until an administrative or judicial determination or citation has been issued or until the completion of a review pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 98.74, whichever is longer, or at a time certain set by the court. Thereafter, a preliminary or permanent injunction may be issued if it is shown to be just and proper. Any temporary injunctive relief shall not prohibit an employer from disciplining or terminating an employee for conduct that is unrelated to the claim of the retaliation.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 916 of the Code of Civil Procedure, injunctive relief granted pursuant to this
 section shall not be stayed pending appeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 460, Sec. 4.   (SB 306)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.7.

(a) The office of the Attorney General shall maintain a whistleblower hotline to receive calls from persons who have information regarding possible violations of state or federal statutes, rules, or regulations, or violations of fiduciary responsibility by a corporation or limited liability company to its shareholders, investors, or employees.

(b) The Attorney General shall refer calls received on the whistleblower hotline to the appropriate government authority for review and possible investigation.

(c) During the initial review of a call received pursuant to subdivision (a), the Attorney General or appropriate government agency shall hold in confidence information disclosed through the whistleblower hotline, including the identity of the caller disclosing the information and the employer identified by the caller.

(d) A call made to the whistleblower hotline pursuant to subdivision (a) or its referral to an appropriate agency under subdivision (b) may not be the sole basis for a time period under a statute of limitation to commence. This section does not change existing law relating to statutes of limitation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 484, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.8.

(a) An employer shall prominently display in lettering larger than size 14 point type a list of employees’ rights and responsibilities under the whistleblower laws, including the telephone number of the whistleblower hotline described in Section 1102.7.

(b) An employer shall be deemed in compliance with the posting requirement set forth in subdivision (a) if the employer posts the model list described in Section 98.11.

(c) A state agency required to post a notice pursuant to Section 8548.2 of the Government Code or subdivision (b) of Section 6128 of the Penal Code shall be deemed in compliance with the posting requirement set forth in subdivision (a) if the notice posted pursuant to Section 8548.2 of the Government Code or subdivision (b) of Section 6128 of the Penal Code also contains the whistleblower hotline number described in Section 1102.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 105, Sec. 2.   (AB 2299)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1103.

An employer or any other person or entity that violates this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable, in the case of an individual, by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year or a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or both that fine and imprisonment, or, in the case of a corporation, by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 732, Sec. 7.   (AB 263)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1104.

In all prosecutions under this chapter, the employer is responsible for the acts of his managers, officers, agents, and employees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1105.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the injured employee from recovering damages from his employer for injury suffered through a violation of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1106.

For purposes of Sections 1102.5, 1102.6, 1102.7, 1102.8, 1104, and 1105, “employee” includes, but is not limited to, any individual employed by the state or any subdivision thereof, any county, city, city and county, including any charter city or county, and any school district, community college district, municipal or public corporation, political subdivision, or the University of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 484, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.1. Whistleblower Protections: Catastrophic Risks in AI Foundation Models [1107. - 1107.2.]

1107.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) (1) “Catastrophic risk” means a foreseeable and material risk that a frontier developer’s development, storage, use, or deployment of a foundation model will materially contribute to the death of, or serious injury to, more than 50 people or more than one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) in damage to, or loss of, property arising from a single incident involving a foundation model doing any of the following:

(A) Providing expert-level assistance in the creation or release of a chemical, biological, radiological, or nuclear weapon.

(B) Engaging in conduct with no meaningful human oversight, intervention, or supervision that is either a cyberattack or, if committed by a human, would constitute the crime of murder, assault, extortion, or theft, including theft by false pretense.

(C) Evading the control of its frontier developer or user.

(2) “Catastrophic risk” does not include a foreseeable and material risk from any of the following:

(A) Information that a foundation model outputs if the information is otherwise publicly accessible in a substantially similar form from a source other than a foundation model.

(B) Lawful activity of the federal government.

(C) Harm caused by a foundation model in combination with other software where the foundation model did not materially contribute to the harm.

(b) “Covered employee” means an employee responsible for assessing, managing, or addressing risk of critical
 safety incidents.

(c) “Critical safety incident” means any of the following:

(1) Unauthorized access to, modification of, or exfiltration of the model weights of a foundation model that results in death, bodily injury, or damage to, or loss of, property.

(2) Harm resulting from the materialization of a catastrophic risk.

(3) Loss of control of a foundation model causing death or bodily injury.

(4) A foundation model that uses deceptive techniques against the frontier developer to subvert the controls or monitoring of its frontier developer outside of the context of an evaluation designed to elicit this behavior and in a manner that demonstrates materially increased catastrophic risk.

(d) “Foundation model” has the meaning defined in Section 22757.11 of the Business and Professions Code.

(e) “Frontier developer” has the meaning defined in Section 22757.11 of the Business and Professions Code.

(f) “Large frontier developer” has the meaning defined in Section 22757.11 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 138, Sec. 4.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1107.1.

(a) A frontier developer shall not make, adopt, enforce, or enter into a rule, regulation, policy, or contract that prevents a covered employee from disclosing, or retaliates against a covered employee for disclosing,
 information to the Attorney General, a federal authority, a person with authority over the covered employee, or another covered employee who has authority to investigate, discover, or correct the reported issue, if the covered employee has reasonable cause to believe that the information discloses either of the following:

(1) The
 frontier developer’s activities pose a specific and substantial danger to the public health or safety resulting from a catastrophic risk.

(2) The frontier developer has violated Chapter 25.1 (commencing
 with Section 22757.10) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) A frontier developer shall not enter into a contract that prevents a covered employee from making a disclosure protected under Section 1102.5.

(c) A covered employee may use the hotline described in Section 1102.7 to make reports described in subdivision (a).

(d) A frontier developer shall provide a clear notice to all covered employees of their rights and responsibilities under this section, including by doing either of the following:

(1) At all times posting and displaying within any workplace maintained by the frontier
 developer a notice to all covered employees of their rights under this section, ensuring that any new covered employee receives equivalent notice, and ensuring that any covered employee who works remotely periodically receives an equivalent notice.

(2) At least once each year, providing written notice to each covered employee of the covered
 employee’s rights under this section and ensuring that the notice is received and acknowledged by all of those covered employees.

(e) (1) A large frontier developer shall provide a reasonable internal process through which
 a
 covered employee may anonymously disclose information to the large
 frontier developer if the covered employee believes in good faith that the information indicates that the large
 frontier developer’s activities present a specific and substantial danger to the public health or safety resulting from a catastrophic risk or that the large frontier developer violated Chapter 25.1 (commencing with Section 22757.10) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code, including a monthly update to the person who made the disclosure regarding the status of the large frontier developer’s investigation of the disclosure and the actions taken by the large frontier developer in
 response to the disclosure.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the disclosures and responses of the process required by this subdivision shall be shared with officers and directors of the large frontier developer at least once each quarter.

(B) If a covered employee has alleged wrongdoing by an officer or director of the large
 frontier developer in a disclosure or response, subparagraph (A) shall not apply with respect to that officer or director.

(f) The court is authorized to award reasonable attorney’s fees to a plaintiff who brings a successful action for a violation of this section.

(g) In a civil action brought pursuant to this section, once it has been demonstrated by a preponderance of the evidence that an activity proscribed by this section was a contributing factor in the alleged prohibited action against the covered employee, the
 frontier
 developer shall have the burden of proof to demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that the alleged action would have occurred for legitimate, independent reasons even if the covered employee had not engaged in activities protected by this section.

(h) (1) In a civil action or administrative proceeding brought pursuant to this section,
 a covered employee may petition the superior court in any county wherein the violation in question is alleged to have occurred, or wherein the person resides or transacts business, for appropriate temporary or preliminary injunctive relief.

(2) Upon the filing of the petition for injunctive relief, the petitioner shall cause notice thereof to be served upon the person, and thereupon the court shall have jurisdiction to grant temporary injunctive relief as the court deems just and proper.

(3) In addition to any harm resulting directly from a violation of this section, the court shall consider the chilling effect on other
 covered employees asserting their rights under this section in determining whether temporary injunctive relief is just and proper.

(4) Appropriate injunctive relief shall be issued on a showing that reasonable cause exists to believe a violation has occurred.

(5) An order authorizing temporary injunctive relief shall remain in effect until an administrative or judicial determination or citation has been issued, or until the completion of a review pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 98.74, whichever is longer, or at a certain time set by the court. Thereafter, a preliminary or permanent injunction may be issued if it is shown to be just and proper. Any temporary injunctive relief shall not prohibit a
 frontier developer from disciplining or terminating a covered employee for conduct that is unrelated to the claim of the retaliation.

(i) Notwithstanding Section 916 of the Code of Civil Procedure, injunctive relief granted pursuant to this section shall not be stayed pending
 appeal.

(j) (1) This section does not impair or limit the applicability of Section 1102.5, including with respect to the rights of employees who are not covered employees to report violations of this chapter or Chapter 25.1 (commencing with Section 22757.10) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code.

 (2) The remedies provided by this section are cumulative to each other and the remedies or penalties available under all other laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 138, Sec. 4.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1107.2.

The loss of value of equity does not count as damage to or loss of property for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 138, Sec. 4.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Agreements in Connection With Trade Disputes [1110. - 1110.]

1110.

No agreement, combination, or contract, by or between two or more persons to do or procure to be done, or not to do or procure not to be done, any act in contemplation or furtherance of any trade dispute between employers and employees in the State is criminal, if the same act committed by one person would not be punishable as a crime. This chapter does not authorize violence, or threats thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Jurisdictional Strikes [1115. - 1122.]

1115.

A jurisdictional strike as herein defined is hereby declared to be against the public policy of the State of California and is hereby declared to be unlawful.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

1116.

Any person injured or threatened with injury by violation of any of the provisions hereof shall be entitled to injunctive relief therefrom in a proper case, and to recover any damages resulting therefrom in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

1117.

As used herein, “labor organization” means any organization or any agency or employee representation committee or any local unit thereof in which employees participate, and exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, hours of employment or conditions of work, which labor organization is not found to be or to have been financed in whole or in part, interfered with, dominated or controlled by the employer or any employer association within one year of the commencement of any proceeding brought under this chapter. The plaintiff shall have the affirmative of the issue with respect to establishing the existence of a “labor organization” as defined herein.

As used herein, “person” means any person, association, organization, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, unincorporated association, or labor organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 179.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1118.

As used in this chapter, “jurisdictional strike” means a concerted refusal to perform work for an employer or any other concerted interference with an employer’s operation or business, arising out of a controversy between two or more labor organizations as to which of them has or should have the exclusive right to bargain collectively with an employer on behalf of his employees or any of them, or arising out of a controversy between two or more labor organizations as to which of them has or should have the exclusive right to have its members perform work for an employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

1119.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to interfere with collective bargaining subject to the prohibitions herein set forth, nor to prohibit any individual voluntarily becoming or remaining a member of a labor organization, or from personally requesting any other individual to join a labor organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

1120.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of such provision to any person or circumstance shall be held invalid, the remainder of this chapter or the application of such provision to persons or circumstances other than those as to which it is held invalid, shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

1122.

Any person who organizes an employee group which is financed in whole or in part, interfered with or dominated or controlled by the employer or any employer association, as well as such employer or employer association, shall be liable to suit by any person who is injured thereby. Said injured party shall recover the damages sustained by him and the costs of suit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1417.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7.5. Collective Bargaining Agreements [1126. - 1128.]

1126.

Any collective bargaining agreement between an employer and a labor organization shall be enforceable at law or in equity, and a breach of such collective bargaining agreement by any party thereto shall be subject to the same remedies, including injunctive relief, as are available on other contracts in the courts of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1188.)
-------------------------------------------

1127.

(a) Where a collective bargaining agreement between an employer and a labor organization contains a successor clause, such clause shall be binding upon and enforceable against any successor employer who succeeds to the contracting employer’s business until the expiration date of the agreement stated in the agreement. No such successor clause shall be binding upon or enforceable against any successor employer for more than three years from the effective date of the collective bargaining agreement between the contracting employer and the labor organization.

(b) As used in this section, “successor employer” means any purchaser, assignee, or transferee of a business the employees of which are subject to a collective bargaining agreement, if such purchaser, assignee, or transferee conducts or will conduct substantially the same business operation, or offer the same service, and use the same physical facilities, as the contracting employer.

(c) This section shall not apply to a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of any contracting employer who has gone into receivership or bankruptcy, or to any employer who acquires a business from a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy, or to any employer which is a public entity, or to any employer who is subject to the National Labor Relations Act, Agricultural Labor Relations Act of 1975, or the Railway Labor Act.

(d) An employer who is a party to a collective bargaining agreement containing a successor clause has the affirmative duty to disclose the existence of such agreement and such clause to any successor employer. Such disclosure requirement shall be satisfied by including in any contract of sale, agreement to purchase, or any similar instrument of conveyance, a statement that the successor employer is bound by such successor clause as provided for in the collective bargaining agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1057.)
-------------------------------------------

1128.

(a) Where a party to a collective bargaining agreement prevails in a court action to compel arbitration of disputes concerning the collective bargaining agreement, the court shall award attorney’s fees to the prevailing party unless the other party has raised substantial and credible issues involving complex or significant questions of law or fact regarding whether or not the dispute is arbitrable under the agreement.

If the dispute is later found to be not arbitrable under the collective bargaining agreement, any award made pursuant to this subdivision shall be vacated and those sums paid to satisfy the award shall be reimbursed to the payor.

(b) Where a party to a collective bargaining agreement appeals the decision of an arbitrator regarding disputes concerning the collective bargaining agreement, the court shall award attorney’s fees to the prevailing appellee unless the appellant has raised substantial issues involving complex or significant questions of law.

(c) Where a party to a collective bargaining agreement prevails in a court action to compel compliance with the decision or award of an arbitrator or a grievance panel regarding disputes concerning the collective bargaining agreement, the court shall award attorney’s fees to the prevailing party unless the other party has raised substantial issues involving complex or significant questions of law.

(d) This section shall not apply to public employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1211, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Professional Strikebreakers [1130. - 1136.2.]



  ARTICLE 1. Findings and Declarations [1130. - 1130.]

1130.

The Legislature hereby makes the following findings and declarations:

Relations between organized labor and management in this state have for many years been marked by a mature adherence to the principles of good faith, collective bargaining and mutual respect for the rights, interest and well-being of working people, business and industry. The importation or use in this state of professional strikebreakers as replacements during a strike or lockout endangers such sound and beneficial relations between labor and management.

Experience in this state and in other parts of this country demonstrates that the utilization of professional strikebreakers in labor disputes is inimical to the public welfare and good order, in that such practices tend to produce and prolong industrial strife, frustrate collective bargaining and encourage violence, crimes and other disorders.

The aforementioned evils are beyond the regulation of applicable federal law, and the mitigation and correction thereof requires the exercise of the police power of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [1132. - 1133.]

1132.

Unless provided otherwise, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------

1132.2.

“Employer” means a person, partnership, firm, corporation, association, or other entity, which employs any person or persons to perform services for a wage or salary, and includes any person, partnership, firm, corporation, limited liability company, association or other entity acting as an agent of an employer, directly or indirectly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 180.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1132.4.

“Employee” means any person who performs services for wages or salary under a contract of employment, express or implied, for an employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------

1132.6.

“Strike” means any concerted act of more than 50 percent of the bargaining unit employees in a lawful refusal of such employees under applicable state or federal law to perform work or services for an employer, other than work stoppages based on conflicting union jurisdictions or work stoppages unauthorized by the proper union governing body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------

1132.8.

“Lockout” means any refusal by an employer to permit any group of five or more employees to work as a result of a dispute with such employees affecting wages, hours or other terms or conditions of employment of such employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------

1133.

“Professional strikebreaker” means any person other than supervisorial personnel who have been in the employ of the employer before the commencement of the strike or lockout or members of the immediate family of the owner of the place of business:

(1) Who during a period of five years immediately preceding the acts described in subdivision (2) of this section has offered himself and has been accepted on repeated occasions to two or more employers at whose places of business a strike or lockout was currently in progress, for employment for the duration of such strike or lockout for the purpose of replacing an employee or employees involved in such strike or lockout, and

(2) Who currently offers himself to an employer at whose place of business a strike or lockout is presently in progress for employment for the purpose of replacing an employee or employees involved in such strike or lockout.

As used in this section:

(a) “Repeated occasions” means on three or more occasions (exclusive of any current offer for employment in connection with a current strike or lockout).

(b) “Employment for the duration of such strike or lockout” includes employment for all or part of the duration of such strike or lockout; and, in connection therewith, includes services during all or part of such strike or lockout which began no more than one month prior to the initiation thereof, or, in the alternative, which concluded not later than one month after the termination of such strike or lockout.

(c) “Employment” means services for an employer, whether compensated by wages, salary, or any other consideration not limited to the foregoing and whether secured, arranged or paid for by an employer or any other person, partnership, firm, corporation, association or other entity.

(d) “Supervisorial personnel” means those employees who have the authority to hire, fire, reward, or discipline other employees of the employer, or who have a history of having had the authority to effectively recommend such action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Professional Strikebreakers [1134. - 1134.2.]

1134.

It shall be unlawful for any employer willingly and knowingly to utilize any professional strikebreaker to replace an employee or employees involved in a strike or lockout at a place of business located within this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------

1134.2.

It shall be unlawful for any professional strikebreaker willingly and knowingly to offer himself for employment or to replace an employee or employees involved in a strike or lockout at a place of business located within this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Miscellaneous [1136. - 1136.2.]

1136.

Any person, partnership, firm, corporation, association or other entity, or officer or agent thereof, who shall violate any of the provisions of this chapter shall upon conviction thereof be subject to a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisonment for a period not to exceed 90 days, or both such fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 204.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

1136.2.

If any part of the provisions of this chapter, or the application thereof, to any person or circumstance is held invalid in the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this chapter, including the application of such part or provision to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby, and this chapter shall otherwise continue in full force and effect and shall otherwise be fully operative. To this end, the provisions of this chapter, and each of them, are hereby declared to be severable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Employer Intimidation [1137. - 1137.]

1137.

(a) This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the “California Worker Freedom from Employer Intimidation Act.”

(b) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Employee” means any individual who performs services for and under the control and direction of an employer for wages or other remuneration.

(2) “Employer” means any individual, partnership, association, corporation, or any agent, representative, designee, or person or group of persons acting directly or indirectly on behalf of or in the interest of an employer with the
 employer’s consent and shall include all branches of state government, or the several counties, cities and counties, and municipalities thereof, or any other political subdivision of the state, or a school district, or any special district, or any authority, commission, or board or any other agency or instrumentality thereof.

(3) “Political matters” means matters relating to elections for political office, political parties, legislation, regulation, and the decision to join or support any political party or political or labor organization.

(4) “Religious matters” means matters relating to religious affiliation and practice and the decision to join or support any religious organization or association.

(c) An